tools/nvda/louis/tables/de-g2-core.cti
nocross always    woll       2-135                        #  ,O  #
nocross always    worden     135-14                       #  OC  #
word       wurd       2456-136-1235-145            #  WURD  #
nocross always    wurd       136                          #  U  #
nocross always    währ       5-2456-125                   #  !WH  #
nocross always    während    345a-145                      #  @D  #
nocross always    wär        5-356a                        #  !)  #
endword    wärts      2456                         #  W  #
word       würd       2456-1256a-1235-145           #  W8RD  #
nocross always    würd       1256a                         #  8  #
always     x          6-1346                       #  'X  #
always     X          6-1346                       #  'X  #
always     y          6-13456                      #  'Y  #
always     Y          6-13456                      #  'Y  #
nocross always    zahl       1356-123                     #  ZL  #
nocross always    zeit       1356-2345                    #  ZT  #
word       zu         1356                         #  Z  #
nocross always    zu         2-1356                       #  ,Z  #
nocross always    zum        1356-134                     #  ZM  #
nocross always    zunächst   1356-1345                    #  ZN  #
nocross always    zur        1356-1235                    #  ZR  #
nocross always    zurück     1356-46a                      #  Z$  #
nocross always    zusammen   1356-234                     #  ZS  #
nocross always    zwischen   1356-2456                    #  ZW  #
nocross always    zähl       5-1356-123                   #  !ZL  #
always     ß          6-2346a                       #  '^  #
nocross always    ähnlich    345a-456a                      #  @_  #
nocross always    änder      5-12456a                      #  !7  #
nocross always    äu         34a                           #  \  #
nocross always    öffentlich 246a-456a                      #  9_  #
word       über       1256a                         #  8  #
nocross always    über       2-1256a                       #  ,8  #
word       überhaupt  1256a-125                     #  8H  #
nocross always    übrig      1256a-45a                      #  8>  #
endword    'st        6-23456a                      #  ']  #

# Ausnahmen:
word       'e         6-6-15                         #  ''E  #
word       'l         6-6-123                        #  ''L  #
word       'm         6-6-134                        #  ''M  #
word       'n         6-6-1345                       #  ''N  #
word       's         6-6-234                        #  ''S  #
word       't         6-6-2345                       #  ''T  #
word       'tsch      6-6-2345-156a                   #  ''T5  #
word       'u         6-6-136                        #  ''U  #
word       ao         6-1-135                        #  'AO  #
word       aos        6-1-135-234                    #  'AOS  #
word       che        6-1456a-15                      #  '4E  #
word       chen       6-1456a-14                      #  '4C  #
word       chens      6-1456a-14-234                  #  '4CS  #
word       chet       6-1456a-15-2345                 #  '4ET  #
word       chets      6-1456a-15-2345-234             #  '4ETS  #
word       dau        6-145-16a                       #  'D1  #
word       dirs       145-1235-234                   #  DRS  #
word       dr         6-145-1235                     #  'DR  #
always     dr.        145-1235-3                     #  DR.  #
word       dschem     6-145-156a-12356a                #  'D5[  #
word       dü         6-145-1256a                    #   'D8  #
word       gsch       6-1245-156a                     #  'G5  #
word       he'd       125-15-6-145                   #  HE'D  #
word       he's       125-15-6-234                   #  HE'S  #
word       ih         6-24-125                       #  'IH  #
word       ihm's      24-125-134-6-234               #  IHM'S  #
word       mal'ach    134-25a-6-1-1456a                #  M:'A4  #
word       mal'n      134-25a-6-1345                  #  M:'N  #
word       mlle       6-134-12345-15                 #  'MQE  #
word       nta        6-1345-2345-1                  #  'NTA  #
word       nu'man     1345-136-6-134-1-1345          #  NU'MAN  #
word       pnin       6-1234-1345-35a                 #  'PN*  #
word       psch       6-1234-156a                     #  'P5  #
word       pschscht   6-1234-156a-156-2345            #  'P55T  #
word       pscht      6-1234-156a-2345                #  'P5T  #
word       qa'im      6-12345-1-6-24-134             #  'QA'IM  #
word       rrm        6-1235-1235-134                #  'RRM  #
word       s'         6-234-6                        #  'S'  #
word       sch'chinah 156a-6-1456a-35a-1-125            #  5'4*AH  #
word       scht       6-156a-2345                     #  '5T  #
word       sgt        6-234-1245-2345                #  'SGT  #
word       tsch       6-2345-156a                     #  'T5  #
word       tschk      6-2345-156a-13                  #  'T5K  #
word       un'ora     256a-6-135-1235-1               #  /'ORA  #
word       when       2456-125-14-1345                  #  'WHC  #
word       where      6-2456-125-12456a-15            #  'WH7E  #
word       whu        6-2456-125-136                 #  'WHU  #
word       über'aupt  2-1256a-6-16a-1234-2345          #  ,8'1PT  #
